Maine, session 132, LD495.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §579-A is enacted to read:
§579-A. Rules designed to reduce greenhouse gas emissions
When adopting rules designed to reduce greenhouse gas emissions, the department
shall issue an estimate, calculated using sound scientific information and methods, of:
1. Prevention of adverse effects on climate. The level of adverse effects on the
climate that will be prevented by the reduction in greenhouse gas emissions; and
2. Costs. The costs associated with the reduction in greenhouse gas emissions,
including the impact on the prices of gasoline, diesel fuel, electricity, heating oil and
propane.